Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.060

Reports, books, records, etc.—Funds, credits, assets—Appropriations or federal grants.

(1) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or other writings relating to the administration of the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to this chapter and available to the transportation benefit district must be made available to the city or county.

(2) All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with powers, duties, and functions transferred under this chapter must be assigned to the city or county.

(3) Any appropriations or federal grant made to the transportation benefit district for the purpose of carrying out the rights, powers, functions, and obligations authorized to be assumed by a city or county pursuant to this chapter, on the effective date of such transfer, must be credited to the city or county for the purpose of carrying out such transferred rights, powers, functions, and obligations.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 306.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.